Arkansas, session 2025, SB291.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 7-4-120(b)(1)(A), concerning complaints of
election law violations filed with the State Board of Election Commissioners,
is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1)(A) A complaint shall be filed with the State Board of Election
Commissioners in writing no earlier than the date established by law for the
delivery or mailing of absentee ballots to a voter and no later than thirty
(30) days following the deadline to certify an election by a county board of
election commissioners forty-nine (49) days prior to the date of the election
and no later than forty-nine (49) days following the date of the election of
the following:
(i) An alleged violation of the laws regarding
elections including without limitation:
(a) Voter registration;
(b) Requests for absentee ballots;
*SSS133*
02/25/2025 8:45:20 AM SSS133

SB291
(c) Delivery of absentee ballots;
(d) Casting of ballots;
(e) Ballot tabulation;
(f) Certification of election results;
(g) Administration of an election;
(h) Election processes; or
(i) Conduct of an election; or
(ii) The election or elections affected or
associated with the complaint.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 7-4-120(b)(1)(B), concerning the contents
of a complaint of election laws filed with the State Board of Election
Commissioners, is amended to read as follows:
(B) A complaint may be referred to the State Board of
Election Commissioners by the Joint Performance Review Committee and is not
subject to the thirty (30) day filing requirement under this subdivision
(b)(1).

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 7-4-120(c)(2)-(4), concerning complaints of
election law violations filed with the State Board of Election Commissioners,
are amended to read as follows:
(2) Except as provided in subdivisions (c)(3) and (4) of this
section, records under this section are exempt from disclosure under the
Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq., until:
(A) A hearing by the State Board of Election Commissioners
is set Thirty (30) days after the final adjudication at which the State Board
of Election Commissioners makes a final decision, at which point the records
of the investigation upon which the State Board of Election Commissioners has
based its findings shall be opened to public inspection; or
(B) The investigation by the State Board of Election
Commissioners is closed by the State Board of Election Commissioners A public
hearing before the State Board of Election Commissioners is set.
(3) The State Board of Election Commissioners shall may
disclose, through its members or staff, otherwise confidential information to
proper law enforcement officers, agencies, and other entities as is necessary
to conduct the investigation under this section.
02/25/2025 8:45:20 AM SSS133

SB291
(4) The records of the investigation upon which the State Board
of Election Commissioners has based its findings shall be opened to public
inspection thirty (30) days after the final adjudication in which the State
Board of Election Commissioners makes a final decision Election monitor
reports generated by a state election monitor are not subject to the
exemptions under this subsection.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 7-4-120(i)(1), concerning complaints of
election law violations filed with the State Board of Election Commissioners,
is amended to read as follows:
(i)(1) The State Board of Election Commissioners shall conclude its
investigation and take its final action under this section within one hundred
eighty (180) one hundred eighty-two (182) days of the filing of a complaint
final deadline to file a complaint for the election.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 7-4-120(i)(3) and (4), concerning
complaints of election law violations filed with the State Board of Election
Commissioners, are amended to read as follows:
(3) However, if If the State Board of Election Commissioners
fails to take its final action within one hundred eighty (180) one hundred
eighty-two (182) days following the deadline to file a complaint, the final
administrative action shall be effective within one hundred eighty (180) one
hundred eighty-two (182) days of the filing of the complaint following the
deadline to file a complaint.
(4) If the State Board of Election Commissioners makes its offer
of settlement and the offer is rejected under this section, the State Board
of Election Commissioners may conduct a hearing and shall take final action
under this section within two hundred forty (240) two hundred forty-five
(245) days.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 7-4-124(f), concerning an election
integrity review conducted by the State Board of Election Commissioners, is
amended to read as follows:
(f) If a county official refuses to provide records requested to
conduct a review under this section, the board may consider the failure to
provide documents as an indication that a criminal election law violation has
02/25/2025 8:45:20 AM SSS133

SB291
occurred authorizing the filing of a complaint under § 7-4-120 more than
thirty (30) forty-nine (49) days after the deadline to certify the election.


































02/25/2025 8:45:20 AM SSS133